Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.060

Notice to creditors—Claims.

The director shall publish once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper which he or she shall select, a notice requiring all persons having claims against such corporation to make proof thereof at the place therein specified not later than ninety days from the date of the first publication of said notice, which date shall be therein stated. He or she shall mail similar notices to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the corporation. He or she may approve or reject any claims, but shall serve notice of rejection upon the claimant by mail or personally. An affidavit of service of such notice shall be prima facie evidence thereof. No action shall be brought on any claim after three months from the date of service of notice of rejection.

Claims of depositors may be presented after the expiration of the time fixed in the notice, and, if approved, shall be entitled to their proportion of prior dividends, if there be funds sufficient therefor, and shall share in the distribution of the remaining assets.

After the expiration of the time fixed in the notice the director shall have no power to accept any claim except the claim of a depositor, and all claims except the claims of depositors shall be barred.

[ 1994 c 92 s 112; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.060. Prior: 1923 c 115 s 10; 1917 c 80 s 63; 1915 c 98 s 4; RRS s 3270. Formerly RCW 30.44.060.]